Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2130
Merger; acquisition; jurisdiction; consent to service of process.

The courts of this state are hereby vested with jurisdiction over every person not resident, domiciled, or authorized to do business in this state who files a statement with the director under section 44-2126 and over all actions involving such person arising out of violations of section 44-2126 or 44-2127, and each such person shall be deemed to have performed acts equivalent to and constituting an appointment by such a person of the director to be such person's attorney upon whom may be served all lawful process in any action, suit, or proceeding arising out of violations of such sections. Copies of all such lawful process shall be served on the director and transmitted by registered or certified mail by the director to such person at his or her last-known address.

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 11.